myspell/de_DE.dic
abgewinnen/DIX
abgleichen/IX
abgleiten/DIX
abklappen/BDIXY
ablöschen/DIXY
abmahnen/BDIXY
Abruf/JS
abschalten/BDIXY
abschleifen/DIX
abschminken/DIXY
abschnüren/DIXY
Abstoß/JTp
abstrahlen/DIXY
abtauchen/DIXY
Abteil/EJPS
abwaschen/BDI
abzugrenzen/D
abzutöten/D
adeln/DIXY
aktivieren/BDIOXY
analysieren/BDIOXY
anbellen/DIXY
anerkennen/BDIX
anfreunden/DIXY
anhalten/DI
ankoppeln/DIXY
anlügen/DIX
Anmut/J
anpassen/DIXY
anrufen/DIX
Anruf/EPJST
anschuldigen/DIXY
anspucken/DIXY
antreffen/DI
anwählen/BIXY
Anzahl/J
anzukreiden/D
arbeiten/DIVXY
armieren/DIOXY
auffahren/BDI
auffangen/BDI
aufheizen/DIXY
aufladen/BDI
aufmachen/DIXY
aufrüsten/BDIXY
aufsaugen/DIXY
aufsplitten/IXYD
aufwärmen/DIXY
aufzurüsten/D
ausbeuten/DIXY
ausdehnen/BDIXY
ausfransen/DIXY
Ausgleich/JS
auskehren/DIXY
auslesen/BDI
ausmerzen/DIXY
ausreichen/DIXY
aussparen/DIXY
Ausstoß/JTp
ausstrecken/DIXY
austauschen/BDIXY
Ausweis/JT
auszubeuten/D
authentifizieren/DIOXYW
basteln/DIXY
beanstanden/BDIOXY
beaufschlagen/IXYDO
bebildern/IOXYW
bedurften/IWX
befristen/DIOXY
befürchten/DIOXY
begnügen/DIOXY
begossen/AWX
begrüßen/DIOXYW
begutachten/BDIOXY
beitreiben/BDIX
beklemmen/DIX
beleihen/BDIX
beliehen/AWX
benehmen/DI
benützen/BDIOXY
bereinigen/DIOXY
Beruf/EJPST
beschaffen/ABDIOXYW
beschlossen/AWX
beschossen/AWX
Besitz/TPJ
besoffen/AWX
bestiegen/AWX
bestimmen/BDIOXY
bestritten/WX
betanken/IOXY
betonen/DIOXY
betrogen/AWX
betupfen/DIOXY
bezahlen/BDIOXY
bezeugen/DIOXY
bezogen/AWX
Blut/JST
Briefmarkensammeln/J
bringen/DIVXW
brüten/DIXY
bürsten/DIXY
Charakterbild/JRT
codieren/BDIOXY
darfst/W
darstellen/BDIXY
davonrasen/DIXY
deselektieren/BDIOXY
Deut/J
dezentralisieren/DIOXY
diffundieren/DIXYW
diktieren/DIOXY
downloaden/WBIXY
dringen/IX
Drossel/J
durchblättern/DIXYW
durchsagen/DIXY
durchschneiden/DIX
einbauen/BDIXY
einbezogen/AWX
einen/DIVXY
Einhalt/JST
einkaufen/BDIXY
einklinken/DIXY
einlesen/BDI
einspannen/DIXY
eintauschen/BDIXY
Eintrag/pJS
Einzahl/J
einzuarbeiten/D
emporheben/DIX
entfärben/DIOXY
entflohen/AWX
enthoben/AWX
entlädt/X
entrinnen/BDIX
entrissen/AWX
Entscheid/EJPST
entsprossen/AWX
entstammen/DIOXY
entweichen/DIXW
entwirft/XW
Entzücken/JS
erblicken/DIOXY
erboten/AWX
erfragen/BDIOXY
erfühlen/DIOXY
erhoben/AWX
Erlös/EJPT
ermessen/DI
erproben/BDIOXY
erschienen/AWX
erschwindeln/DIOXY
erstanden/AWX
erstellen/DIOXY
erwarten/BDIOXY
Erwerb/JRS
evaluieren/BDIOXY
fädeln/DIXY
Feder/J
Fehlentscheid/J
festlegen/BDIXY
festsitzen/DIX
ficken/DIXYW
filtern/DIXY
Finanzier/JS
Firmen/J
flechten/BDIX
Folter/J
fortjagen/DIXY
fräsen/DIXYW
freizukämpfen/D
fühlen/BDIXY
gähnen/DIXY
gediehen/AWX
gestalten/BDIOXY
Gestalt/JP
giltst/VWX
Glieder/J
glucksen/DIXY
Grab/J
greifen/BDIVXW
Großunternehmen/J
haben/DIW
Haft/J
halluzinieren/DIXY
heizen/BDIVXY
herabsacken/IXY
herausfahren/ID
herbeischaffen/DIXY
herschieben/DIX
herumblättern/DIXY
hilft/VXW
hinausposaunen/IXYD
hineindrängen/DIXY
hineinfallen/DI
hinzuziehen/DIX
historisieren/DIXY
hochgehen/DIX
impfen/BDIXY
installieren/BDIOXY
isst/W
kalbern/DIXY
kalkulieren/BDIOVXY
kaltschmieden/DIXY
kaltstellen/DIXY
klassifizieren/BDIOXY
kommen/DIVXW
kompensieren/BDIOXY
kompilieren/IXYDOB
kompromittieren/DIOXY
kondolieren/DIXY
Koppel/JN
korrigieren/BDIOXY
lachen/DIXYW
lagern/BDIVXY
Land/JT
lauschen/DIXY
läuten/DIXY
leidtragen/ID
Los/EJPT
machen/BDIVXYW
magst/VW
missbrauchen/DIOXY
missglücken/DIOXY
missverstanden/AWX
missverstehen/DIX
mobilisieren/BDIOXY
nachbauen/BDIXY
nachdrängen/IXYD
nacheifern/DIXY
nachfüllen/BDIXY
nachsehen/BDI
Neueintrag/pJ
Norden/SW
nörgeln/DIXY
normieren/BDIOXY
okkupieren/DIOXY
paralysieren/DIOXY
parieren/BDIOXY
photokopieren/BIOXY
Polster/JNS
posaunen/DIXYW
präsentieren/BDIOXY
programmieren/BDIOXY
promovieren/DIOXY
Regel/J
regeln/BDIXY
reimplementieren/BDIOXY
reinitialisieren/IXYDOB
Reiz/EJPT
reparieren/BDIOXY
replizieren/DIOXYW
rutschen/DIVXYW
Satz/EJT
Schachtel/JN
Schal/JS
schassen/DIXY
schaukeln/DIXY
Schicht/J
schienen/DIXY
Schilder/JN
schmieden/BDIXY
Schrecken/SW
schreien/DIX
schuppen/DIXY
Schwank/J
schwärzen/DIXY
Schweif/JS
Sitz/JT
skalieren/BDIXY
sollen/DWXY
Spalt/JS
spreizen/DIXY
spurten/DIXY
Staffel/J
stärken/DIVXY
Steuer/JN
Stockflecken/SW
Stör/JS
strafen/BDIXY
surren/DIXY
systematisieren/DIOXYW
Tageszeit/JP
Takel/JS
takeln/DIXY
tätowieren/DIOXY
traversieren/BDIOXY
trinken/BDIVXW
tröpfeln/DIXY
turnen/DIXY
überblicken/DIOXY
überflogen/AWX
überschrieben/AWX
übersehen/ABDI
übersenden/DIXY
überstrichen/AWX
überströmen/IXYDO
übertünchen/IXYDO
umflogen/AWX
Umkehr/J
umrechnen/DIXY
umschrieben/AWX
umschulen/DIXY
umsorgen/DIOXY
umsortieren/BDIOXY
Unternehmen/JS
unterschrieben/AWX
Unterteil/JS
veralten/DIOXY
verändern/BDIOXY
verängstigen/DIOXY
verbilligen/DIOXY
verflossen/AW
verformen/BDIOXY
verfrachten/DIOXY
verfünffachen/DIOXY
verhaften/DIOXY
verifizieren/BDIOXY
verkniffen/AWX
verlosen/DIOXY
vermarkten/BDIOXY
vermieden/AWX
vermitteln/BDIOXY
vernebeln/DIOXY
verschränken/DIOXY
verschwenden/DIOXY
verschwiegen/AWX
verspielen/DIOXY
verspinnen/BDIX
Versuch/EJPST
vertrieben/AWX
verzagen/DIOXY
verzehren/BDIOXY
verzichten/BDIXY
vitaminisieren/DIOXY
Volksstimmen/J
vollzogen/AWX
vorhersagen/IXYDB
vorsehen/DI
vorstoßen/DI
wähnen/DIXY
wegzaubern/IXYD
weinen/DIXY
widerhallen/IXYD
wiederkommen/DIX
Wind/JT
wittern/DIVXY
Zeit/JP
zerlegen/BDIOXY
zerpflücken/DIOXY
zerwühlen/DIOXY
zoomen/IXYDW
zubereiten/DIOXY
zurechtbasteln/IXYD
zurückerhalten/DI
zurückprallen/IXYD
zusammenkommen/IXD
zusammenlegen/IXYDB
zusammentrommeln/IXYD
zwängen/DIXY
